Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.005

Comprehensive outreach and marketing strategic plan.

To ensure that it is adequately and thoroughly reaching potential recruits, the Washington state patrol must develop a comprehensive outreach and marketing strategic plan that expands on the success of current strategies and looks for ways to tap into groups or individuals that do not currently show an interest in the state patrol or law enforcement as a career. The plan must include, but is not limited to, expanding marketing and outreach efforts online and through other media outlets and expanding recruitment relationships in respective communities. The plan must also include polling applicants about their application. Results from the polling must be tracked to determine the success of each outreach method.

[ 2016 c 28 s 7.]

NOTES:

Intent—2016 c 28: See note following RCW 43.43.380.